Wyoming, session 2025, HB0057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-10-205, 35-10-208(a)(intro), (c)
and by creating a new subsection (d) and 36-8-104(a)(i),
(ii) and by creating a new paragraph (iii) are amended to
read:

35-10-205. Further regulations by municipalities.
HB0057

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0186

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act shall not be construed to prohibit the
imposition by municipal ordinance of further regulations or
prohibitions upon the sale, use and possession of fireworks
within the corporate limits of any city or town, including
those items defined under 15 U.S.C. 1261, but no such city
or town shall permit or authorize the sale, use or
possession of any fireworks in violation of this act.

(b) No municipal ordinance shall prohibit or
otherwise regulate the use or possession of fireworks
between noon and midnight on July 4 of each year if the use
or possession would otherwise be permissible under this act
unless the prohibition or regulation is part of an open
fire ban.

35-10-208. County regulation of fireworks.

(a) For the purpose of this section, "fireworks"
means only those items which may be sold or offered for
sale under 15 U.S.C. 1261, 21 U.S.C. 371 and 16 C.F.R.,
Commercial Practices, part 1507. A board of county
HB0057

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0186
commissioners may, subject to subsection subsections (b)
and (d) of this section:

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, any resolution adopted by a county prohibiting the
sale or use of fireworks which was in effect on February 1,
1990, is deemed to be valid unless amended or repealed by
the board of county commissioners pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section.

(d) No resolution adopted by a county shall prohibit
or otherwise regulate the use or possession of fireworks
between noon and midnight on July 4 of each year if the use
or possession would otherwise be permissible under this act
unless the prohibition or regulation is part of an open
fire ban.

36-8-104. Use of firearms, fireworks, explosives and
weapons prohibited; exceptions.

(a) The use of firearms, fireworks, explosives and
weapons of all kinds is prohibited in all state parks,
HB0057

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0186
campgrounds, recreational grounds, historic landmarks or
historic sites providing, however, that:

(i) Firearms and weapons that otherwise comply
with state law may be used at such times and in such places
as the Wyoming game and fish commission may designate; and

(ii) A supervised public fireworks display may
be held in a state park that is not subject to an open fire
ban if the fireworks operator has obtained both a special
use permit from the superintendent of the park, pursuant to
department rules and regulations, and a permit for the
display pursuant to W.S. 35-10-203;. and

(iii) The use or possession of fireworks not
otherwise prohibited under W.S. 35-10-201 through 35-10-208
shall be allowed without restriction in all state parks,
campgrounds, recreational grounds, historic landmarks and
historic sites between noon and midnight on July 4 of each
year except in areas subject to an open fire ban.

HB0057

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0186
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0057